Arkansas, session 2025, HB1204.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF ARKANSAS:

SECTION 1. Arkansas Code § 16-64-120 is amended to read as follows:
16-64-120. Recovery of damages.
(a) Whenever damages are recoverable, the plaintiff may claim and
recover any rate of damages to which he or she may be entitled for the cause
of action established.
(b) Recovery of damages under subsection (a) of this section for past
necessary medical care, past necessary medical treatment, or past necessary
medical services received includes only those costs actually paid by or on
behalf of the plaintiff or that remain unpaid and for which the plaintiff or
any third party is legally responsible.


*CEB053*
01/22/2025 2:56:43 PM CEB053